Washington statutes.
RCW 23.86.900

Application—1989 c 307.

The provisions of this chapter relating to domestic cooperative associations shall apply to:

(1) All cooperative associations organized under this chapter; and

(2) All agricultural cooperative associations organized under *chapter 24.32 RCW. All such agricultural cooperatives are deemed to have been incorporated under this chapter.

[ 1989 c 307 s 2.]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: Chapter 24.32 RCW was repealed by 1989 c 307.

Legislative finding—1989 c 307: See note following RCW 23.86.007.